Idaho, session 2025, S1012.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 22, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 55, Title 22, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 55
Idaho Depredating Wildlife Appeals Board
22-5501. IDAHO DEPREDATING WILDLIFE APPEALS BOARD. (1) There is
hereby created the Idaho depredating wildlife appeals board in the office
of the governor. The purpose of the board is to provide an appeal option for
individuals who have suffered losses or damages from depredating wildlife
but received a determination that such depredation could not be confirmed
following the initial investigation. For purposes of this section, depre-
dating wildlife includes grizzly bears, black bears, mountain lions, and
wolves. The Idaho state department of agriculture, in consultation with
the department of fish and game, is authorized to carry out the purposes of
this section. The Idaho depredating wildlife appeals board shall consist of
three (3) members representing the following executive agencies and profes-
sional expertise:
(a) The director of the Idaho state department of agriculture or the di-
rector's authorized designee;
(b) The director of the Idaho department of fish and game or the direc-
tor's authorized designee; and
(c) A large animal veterinarian appointed by the governor.
(2) The office of species conservation shall receive appeal requests
from appellants and coordinate meetings with the Idaho depredating wildlife
appeals board.
(3) The board shall consider all forms of evidence submitted by the ap-
pellant related to the depredation event, including but not limited to:
(a) Testimony of the affected individual;
(b) Testimony of the initial investigator;
(c) The initial investigator's report;
(d) Eyewitness testimony;


(e) Telemetry data;
(f) Photographs and video footage;
(g) Trapping and hunting reports from the past six (6) months;
(h) Previous depredation incidents in the area; and
(i) Expert analysis.
(4) The board shall make a ruling based on submitted evidence and, if
justified, amend the original determination based on a majority vote of the
board. The decision of the board shall be final and binding for the purpose
of receiving compensation for depredation.
(5) Any ruling made by the Idaho depredating wildlife appeals board of
confirmed depredation shall be counted toward official counts of depreda-
tion incidents.
(6) The board shall be considered a state authorized investigator but
shall only serve as an appeal to the initial investigation.
(7) Meetings of the board shall not be subject to the provisions of
chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code.
(8) Initial investigators of depredation incidents from depredating
wildlife shall inform individuals of their right to appeal any ruling to the
Idaho depredating wildlife appeals board in writing.
SECTION 2. That Section 74-203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-203. GOVERNING BODIES -- REQUIREMENT FOR OPEN PUBLIC MEETINGS. (1)
Except as provided below, all meetings of a governing body of a public agency
shall be open to the public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any
meeting except as otherwise provided by this act. No decision at a meeting of
a governing body of a public agency shall be made by secret ballot.
(2) Deliberations of the board of tax appeals created in chapter 38, ti-
tle 63, Idaho Code, the public utilities commission and the industrial com-
mission in a fully submitted adjudicatory proceeding in which hearings, if
any are required, have been completed, and in which the legal rights, duties
or privileges of a party are to be determined are not required by this act to
take place in a meeting open to the public. Such deliberations may, however,
be made and/or conducted in a public meeting at the discretion of the agency.
(3) Meetings of the Idaho life and health insurance guaranty associa-
tion established under chapter 43, title 41, Idaho Code, the Idaho insurance
guaranty association established under chapter 36, title 41, Idaho Code, and
the surplus line association approved by the director of the Idaho depart-
ment of insurance as authorized under chapter 12, title 41, Idaho Code, and
the Idaho depredating wildlife appeals board established under chapter 55,
title 22, Idaho Code, are not required by this act to take place in a meeting
open to the public.
(4) A governing body shall not hold a meeting at any place where dis-
crimination on the basis of race, creed, color, sex, age or national origin
is practiced.
(5) All meetings may be conducted using telecommunications devices
which enable all members of a governing body participating in the meeting
to communicate with each other. Such devices may include, but are not lim-
ited to, telephone or video conferencing devices and similar communications
equipment. Participation by a member of the governing body through telecom-


munications devices shall constitute presence in person by such member at
the meeting; provided however, that at least one (1) member of the govern-
ing body, or the director of the public agency, or the chief administrative
officer of the public agency shall be physically present at the location
designated in the meeting notice, as required under section 74-204, Idaho
Code, to ensure that the public may attend such meeting in person. The com-
munications among members of a governing body must be audible to the public
attending the meeting in person and the members of the governing body.
SECTION 3. That Section 36-1109, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-1109. CONTROL OF DAMAGE BY BLACK BEARS, GRIZZLY BEARS OR MOUNTAIN
LIONS -- COMPENSATION FOR DAMAGE. (a) Prevention of depredation shall be a
priority management objective of the department, and it is the obligation of
landowners to take all reasonable steps to prevent property loss from black
bears, grizzly bears or mountain lions or to mitigate damage by such. The
director, or his representative, will consult with appropriate land manage-
ment agencies and landusers land users before transplanting or relocating
any black bear, grizzly bear or mountain lion.
(b) When any black bear, grizzly bear or mountain lion has done damage
to or is destroying livestock on public, state, or private land, whether
owned or leased, or when any black bear or grizzly bear has done damage
to or is destroying berries, bees, beehives or honey on private land, the
owner or his representative of such livestock shall, for the purposes of
filing a claim, report such loss to a representative of the U.S. department
of agriculture animal plant and health inspection services/animal damage
control (APHIS/ADC) who shall, within seventy-two (72) hours, investigate
the conditions complained of. For purposes of this section, livestock shall
be defined as domestic cattle, sheep, and goats. For purposes of this sec-
tion, grizzly bear shall be defined as any grizzly bear not protected by
the federal endangered species act. If it appears that the complaint is
well-founded and livestock, berries, bees, beehives or honey of the com-
plainant has been damaged or destroyed by such black bear, grizzly bear or
mountain lion, APHIS/ADC shall so inform the owner or his representative, in
writing, of the extent of physical damage or destruction in question and of
the option to appeal through the Idaho depredating wildlife appeals board,
as provided in section 22-5501, Idaho Code. The owner shall provide the
director or the department's regional office with the APHIS/ADC or Idaho
depredating wildlife appeals board determination of damages or destruction.
The physical damages, without establishing a monetary value thereon, as de-
termined by the APHIS/ADC representative or the Idaho depredating wildlife
appeals board, if the determination is so appealed, shall be final, and shall
be binding upon the owner or his representative and on the department.
(c) Any claim for damages must be in written form, shall be in the form
of a claim for damages substantially the same as required in section 6-907,
Idaho Code, shall be attested to by the claimant under oath, and the claim
shall be for an amount of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) in damages
per occurrence. The department shall prepare and make available suitable
forms for claims for damages. Claims may be submitted only for the fiscal
year (July 1 through June 30) in which they occurred. Any person submitting


a fraudulent claim shall be prosecuted for a felony as provided in section
18-2706, Idaho Code.
1. Upon receipt by the department, the department shall review the
claim, and if approved, pay it as provided in section 36-115, Idaho
Code. Failure on the part of the owner or representative to allow
on-site access shall negate the claim for damages.
2. If the department accepts the claim for damages as submitted by the
owner or his representative, the department may approve the claim for
payment, or may make a counter offer counteroffer. If the owner or his
representative rejects the department's counter offer counteroffer,
this rejection or refusal must be in writing and submitted within five
(5) business days. The value of the damage or destruction will then be
determined pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b)3. of section
36-1108, Idaho Code, and, in circumstances so provided for by the provi-
sions of subsection (b)3. of section 36-1108, Idaho Code, pursuant to
the provisions of subsection (b)4. of section 36-1108, Idaho Code. Any
claim received by the department under the provisions of this section
must be processed by the department within sixty (60) calendar days of
receipt. If the claim is approved for payment, the claim must be imme-
diately forwarded to the department of administration for payment. Any
damage claim determination by an independent insurance adjuster, ac-
cepted by the parties, must be paid by the department within forty-five
(45) days of the determination. If the claim is arbitrated, the arbi-
tration must be completed within one hundred eighty (180) days of filing
the claim for such damages.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.